Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0259.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6452. (1) Every claim against this state, cognizable by the court of claims, is forever barred unless the claim is filed with the clerk of the court or an action is commenced on the claim in federal court as authorized in section 6440, within 3 years after the claim first accrues. (2) Except as modified by this section, chapter 58, relative to the limitation of actions, also applies to the limitation under this section. (3) The attorney general has the same right as a creditor under the statutes of this state to petition for the appointment of a personal representative of the estate of a deceased person. (4) The attorney general has the same right as a superintendent of the poor under the statutes of this state to petition for the appointment of a guardian of the estate of a minor or any other individual under a disability. (5) This section does not apply to a claim for either of the following: (a) A claim for compensation under the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. (b) A claim to which section 5851b applies. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act applies retroactively to actions pending on the effective date of this amendatory act and to actions brought under section 5851b(4) of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.5851b. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 258. (b)    Senate Bill No. 257.